Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 2. Certificate of Public Convenience and Necessity.

Sec. 42.06.240.
Certificate required; special requirements for North Slope natural gas.

After January 1, 1974 a pipeline carrier, or person that will be a pipeline carrier upon completion of any proposed construction or extension, may not engage in the transportation of oil or gas by pipeline subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, or undertake the construction or extension of any pipeline facilities for that purpose, or acquire or operate any pipeline facilities or extension, unless there is in force with respect to that pipeline carrier a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the commission authorizing those acts or operations. A certificate shall describe the nature and extent of the authority granted in it, including, as appropriate for the services involved, a description of the authorized area and scope of operation of the oil or gas pipeline facility.

If any person or predecessor in interest was engaged in transportation of oil or gas by pipeline or construction of an oil or gas pipeline on or before January 1, 1974, the commission shall issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity for that pipeline without hearings or proceedings. For purposes of this section, “construction” includes application for a federal right-of-way permit.

In an area where the commission determines that two or more oil or gas pipelines facilities are competing or are planning to compete to offer identical oil or gas pipeline service, and this competition is not in the public interest, the commission shall take appropriate action to eliminate or not allow the competition and undesirable duplication of facilities.

The commission may attach to certificates of convenience and necessity terms and conditions and require issuance of securities it considers necessary for the protection of the environment and for the best interest of the oil or gas pipeline facility and the general public.

The requirement for a certificate does not operate to impose state regulation that has been preempted under federal law. When federal law has preempted state regulation the commission shall accept the findings made under the federal scheme of regulation.

In addition to other requirements of (a) — (e) of this section, the provisions of this subsection apply to a certificate of public convenience and necessity for a North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier or person that will be a North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier under this chapter:

the person making application shall dedicate a portion of the pipeline’s initial capacity sufficient to transport the total volume of North Slope natural gas that has been committed by producers and shippers of North Slope natural gas to tendering for intrastate firm transportation service at the time that the operation of the North Slope natural gas pipeline commences;

upon receipt of the certificate application under this subsection, the commission shall issue a public notice inviting prospective intrastate shippers of North Slope natural gas to file requests for service; a request for service submitted by a shipper in response to a notice issued under this paragraph must include a proof of the shipper’s commitment to use the North Slope natural gas pipeline for intrastate firm transportation service, specifying the volume of North Slope natural gas that the shipper will tender for initial intrastate firm transportation service;

in its review of an application submitted under this subsection,

for purposes of evaluating the total volume of intrastate transportation of North Slope natural gas to be accepted for initial intrastate transportation, the commission shall determine total volume based upon written commitments to tender North Slope natural gas for intrastate firm transportation service continuously for a period of not less than three years after the operation of the North Slope natural gas pipeline commences as follows:

each request for service by an intrastate shipper that is a public utility, as that term is defined in AS

42.05.990

, for the purpose of furnishing natural gas for ultimate consumption within the state by its customers that individually consume an average annual volume of less than 20,000,000 standard cubic feet of gas per day shall be supported by a written commitment by the public utility that sets out the utility’s best current estimate of the average annual volume that the utility will require during the three-year period;

each request for service by an intrastate shipper that is not a public utility, as that term is defined in AS

42.05.990

, and each request for service by a public utility for the purpose of furnishing natural gas for ultimate consumption within the state by a customer that individually consumes an average annual volume of 20,000,000 or more standard cubic feet of gas per day, that purchases North Slope natural gas from a North Slope natural gas producer, must be supported by one or more contracts for the purchase of the North Slope natural gas on a take-or-pay basis that extends for a period of not less than three years after the operation of the North Slope natural gas pipeline commences;

the commission may consider peak volumes specified in the written commitments of North Slope natural gas producers and purchase contracts; and

the commission shall set out in its order granting a certificate of public convenience and necessity the total volume of intrastate North Slope natural gas that the North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier shall accept for intrastate transportation; the total volume may not exceed the volume substantiated by written commitments and contracts that comply with the requirements of this chapter;

if the North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier wants to transport North Slope natural gas within the state in excess of the amount set out in the statement of total volume in the pipeline carrier’s certificate of public convenience and necessity, the pipeline carrier may apply for authority to transport a greater volume of North Slope natural gas within the state than the carrier is required by the commission to transport in its order entered under (3)(B) of this subsection; the commission shall grant the authority requested by the pipeline carrier if the commission determines that the pipeline carrier’s transportation of a greater volume is consistent with public convenience and necessity.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am §§ 1, 2 ch 6 FSSLA 1973; am § 11 ch 110 SLA 1981; am § 4 ch 56 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

Collateral references. —

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Carriers, §§ 75 — 104.

13 C.J.S., Carriers, §§ 15 — 24.

Sec. 42.06.245.
Federally regulated carriers.

The requirements of this chapter pertaining to permits and certificates of public convenience and necessity do not apply to the construction of a pipeline facility exclusively subject to federal jurisdiction or to the interstate portion of the business of a pipeline or pipeline carrier exclusively subject to federal jurisdiction. However, the requirements of this chapter for permits and certificates of public convenience and necessity do apply to all the intrastate portion of the business of a pipeline or pipeline carrier subject to federal jurisdiction whenever it engages in intrastate commerce. However, nothing limits the powers of the commission set out in this chapter except to the extent they are preempted by federal law.

History.

(§ 3 ch 6 FSSLA 1973; am § 12 ch 110 SLA 1981; am § 34 ch 32 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For Alaska Natural Gas Transportation Act of 1976, see 15 U.S.C. 719; for Natural Gas Act, see 15 U.S.C. 717.

Sec. 42.06.250.
Application.

Application for a certificate shall be made in writing to the commission, verified under oath. The commission, by regulation, shall establish the requirements for the form of the application, and the information to be contained in it. Notice of the application shall be served upon the interested parties in the manner that the commission by regulation requires.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 35 ch 32 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

Sec. 42.06.260.
Public hearings.

At least 30 days before issuing a certificate of convenience and necessity, the commission shall hold a public hearing on the application. Copies of the completed application shall be made available to the public at least 10 days before the public hearing date.
A transcript of the public hearing shall be included in the permanent record of agency action on that application, and copies of the public hearing transcripts shall be available to the public.
The commission may, without notice of hearing and pending the determination of an application for a certificate, issue a temporary certificate in cases of emergency, to assure maintenance of adequate service or to serve particular customers, and may by regulation exempt from the requirements of this section temporary acts or operations for which the issuance of a certificate will not be required in the public interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

Sec. 42.06.270.
Grant or denial of application.

Unless governed by AS

42.06.240(b)

, a certificate shall be issued to a qualified applicant, authorizing the whole or any part of the operation, service, construction, extension, or acquisition covered by the application, if it is found that the applicant is able and willing properly to do the acts and to perform the service proposed and to conform to the provisions of this chapter and the requirements and regulations of the commission, and that the proposed service, operation, construction, extension, or acquisition, to the extent authorized by the certificate, is or will be required by the present or future public convenience and necessity; otherwise the application shall be denied.

The commission, after a hearing upon its own motion or upon application, may determine the gathering areas, or the routes over which, the fixed termini between which, and the intermediate and off route points, if any, to which each authorization under this section is to be limited.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as a limitation upon the power of the commission to grant certificates of public convenience and necessity for service of an area, or routes, already being served by another pipeline.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 88 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, made a stylistic change in (a).

Sec. 42.06.280.
Insurance and security.

The commission may require a lessee to procure and furnish liability and property damage insurance from a company licensed to do business in the state or furnish other security or undertaking upon the terms and conditions the commission considers necessary if the commission finds that the net assets of the lessee are insufficient to protect the public from damage for which the lessee may be liable arising out of the construction or operation of the pipeline.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 6 FSSLA 1973; am § 110 ch 6 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.06.285.
Pipeline carrier regulatory cost charge. [Repealed, § 36 ch 2 FSSLA 1992.]

Sec. 42.06.286.
Pipeline carrier regulatory cost charge.

A pipeline carrier operating in the state shall pay to the commission an annual regulatory cost charge in an amount not to exceed the sum of the following percentages of gross revenue derived from operations in the state: (1) not more than .7 percent to fund the operations of the commission, and (2) not more than .17 percent to fund operations of the public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

within the Department of Law. A regulatory cost charge may not be assessed on pipeline carrier operations unless the operations are within the jurisdiction of the commission.

The commission shall by regulation establish a method to determine annually the amount of the regulatory cost charge. If the amount the commission expects to collect under (a) of this section and under AS

42.05.254(a)

exceeds the authorized budgets of the commission and the Department of Law public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

, the commission shall, by order, reduce the percentage determined under (e) of this section so that the total amount of the fees collected approximately equals the authorized budgets of the commission and the Department of Law public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

for the fiscal year.

The commission shall administer the charge imposed under this section. The Department of Revenue shall collect and enforce the charge imposed under this section. The Department of Administration shall identify the amount of the operating budgets of the commission and the Department of Law public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

that lapse into the general fund each year. The legislature may appropriate an amount equal to the lapsed amount to the commission and to the Department of Law public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

for operating costs for the next fiscal year. If the legislature does so, the commission shall reduce the total regulatory cost charge collected for that fiscal year by a comparable amount.

The commission may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) necessary to administer this section, including requirements and procedures for reporting information and making quarterly payments. The Department of Revenue may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) for investigating the accuracy of filed information, and for collecting required payments.

The commission shall by regulation establish a method to determine annually the maximum percentage of gross revenue that will apply to each regulated public utility sector, the certificated telecommunications utility sector, and the regulated pipeline carrier sector in accordance with AS

42.05.254(h)

.

In this section, “gross revenue” means the total intrastate operating revenue as shown in a pipeline carrier’s annual report required by the commission by regulation.

History.

(§ 10 ch 1 SLA 1995; am §§ 14, 15 ch 25 SLA 1999; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 98 SLA 2004; am § 12 ch 24 SLA 2019)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (e) was enacted as (f). Relettered in 1999, at which time former (e) was relettered as (f) and the reference to “(e)” in subsection (b) was substituted for “(f)” in conformity with these changes. In 2005, in subsection (e), “AS

42.05.254(h)

” was substituted for “AS

42.05.254(i)

” to reflect the 1999 relettering of AS

42.05.254(i)

.

Administrative Code. —

For applicability, see 3 AAC 47, art. 1.

For regulatory cost charges for regulated public utilities and pipeline carriers, see 3 AAC 47, art. 2.

For regulatory cost charges for exempt utilities, see 3 AAC 47, art. 3.

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective November 27, 2019, in (e), substituted “sector, the certificated telecommunications utility sector, and the regulated” for “sector and the maximum percentage of gross revenue that will apply to the regulated”.

Sec. 42.06.290.
Abandonment; discontinuance, and suspension of service.

A pipeline carrier may not abandon or permanently discontinue use of all or any portion of a pipeline or abandon or discontinue any service rendered by means of a pipeline that is the subject of a certificate of convenience and necessity, without the permission and approval of the commission, after due notice and hearing, and a finding by the commission that continued service is not required by public convenience and necessity. Any interested person may file with the commission a protest or memorandum of opposition to or in support of discontinuance or abandonment. The commission may authorize temporary suspension of a service or of part of a service.

Upon complaint or upon its own motion, the commission may reinvestigate a previously authorized discontinuance, abandonment, or suspension of a service described in (a) of this section. If, after due notice and hearing, the commission finds that the public convenience and necessity requires the service to be resumed, and that there has not been detrimental reliance on the previous authorization, it may order the operator or owner of the oil or gas pipeline facility to again provide the service.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

Sec. 42.06.300.
Modification, suspension, or revocation of certificates.

Upon complaint or upon its own motion the commission, after due notice and hearing and for good cause shown, may amend, modify, suspend, or revoke a certificate, in whole or in part.
Good cause for amendment, modification, suspension, or revocation of a certificate shall be

the requirements of public convenience and necessity;

misrepresentation of a material fact in obtaining the certificate;

unauthorized discontinuance or abandonment of all or part of a service that is the subject of the certificate;

wilful failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the regulations or orders of the commission; or

wilful failure to comply with a term, condition, or limitation of the certificate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

Sec. 42.06.305.
Transfer of operating authority.

Operating authority may not be transferred by sale or lease of the certificate or by the sale of substantially all of the stock or assets of a pipeline carrier holding a certificate without the prior approval of the commission. A transfer not involving a substantial change in ownership shall be summarily approved.

The commission’s decision under this section shall be based on the best interest of the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 35 SLA 1977; am § 17 ch 25 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.